West Virginia, session 2026, SB505.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. commissioner of human services; powers, duties and resposibilities generally. §9-2-14. Coverage for postpartum healthcare. Pregnant women and new parents up to 24 months postpartum, and children up to age two shall be eligible for participation in the West Virginia Medicaid Program if:(1)  They have family income up to but not exceeding 185 percent (185%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines as promulgated by the Department of Health and Human Services of the United States as revised annually; and(2) They are otherwise eligible for the program.